epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/hr.xml
	<patterns>
		a1a2
		a1e2
		a1i2
		a1o2
		a1u2
		e1a2
		e1e2
		e1i2
		e1o2
		e1u2
		i1a2
		i1e2
		i1i2
		i1o2
		i1u2
		o1a2
		o1e2
		o1i2
		o1o2
		o1u2
		u1a2
		u1e2
		u1i2
		u1o2
		u1u2
		a1ba
		a1be
		a1bi
		a1bo
		a1bu
		a1ca
		a1ce
		a1ci
		a1co
		a1cu
		a1ča
		a1če
		a1či
		a1čo
		a1ču
		a1ća
		a1će
		a1ći
		a1ćo
		a1ću
		a1da
		a1de
		a1di
		a1do
		a1du
		a1dža
		a1dže
		a1dži
		a1džo
		a1džu
		a1đa
		a1đe
		a1đi
		a1đo
		a1đu
		a1fa
		a1fe
		a1fi
		a1fo
		a1fu
		a1ga
		a1ge
		a1gi
		a1go
		a1gu
		a1ha
		a1he
		a1hi
		a1ho
		a1hu
		a1ja
		a1je
		a1ji
		a1jo
		a1ju
		a1ka
		a1ke
		a1ki
		a1ko
		a1ku
		a1la
		a1le
		a1li
		a1lo
		a1lu
		a1lja
		a1lje
		a1lji
		a1ljo
		a1lju
		a1ma
		a1me
		a1mi
		a1mo
		a1mu
		a1na
		a1ne
		a1ni
		a1no
		a1nu
		a1nja
		a1nje
		a1nji
		a1njo
		a1nju
		a1pa
		a1pe
		a1pi
		a1po
		a1pu
		a1ra
		a1re
		a1ri
		a1ro
		a1ru
		a1sa
		a1se
		a1si
		a1so
		a1su
		a1ša
		a1še
		a1ši
		a1šo
		a1šu
		a1ta
		a1te
		a1ti
		a1to
		a1tu
		a1va
		a1ve
		a1vi
		a1vo
		a1vu
		a1za
		a1ze
		a1zi
		a1zo
		a1zu
		a1ža
		a1že
		a1ži
		a1žo
		a1žu
		e1ba
		e1be
		e1bi
		e1bo
		e1bu
		e1ca
		e1ce
		e1ci
		e1co
		e1cu
		e1ča
		e1če
		e1či
		e1čo
		e1ču
		e1ća
		e1će
		e1ći
		e1ćo
		e1ću
		e1da
		e1de
		e1di
		e1do
		e1du
		e1dža
		e1dže
		e1dži
		e1džo
		e1džu
		e1đa
		e1đe
		e1đi
		e1đo
		e1đu
		e1fa
		e1fe
		e1fi
		e1fo
		e1fu
		e1ga
		e1ge
		e1gi
		e1go
		e1gu
		e1ha
		e1he
		e1hi
		e1ho
		e1hu
		e1ja
		e1je
		e1ji
		e1jo
		e1ju
		e1ka
		e1ke
		e1ki
		e1ko
		e1ku
		e1la
		e1le
		e1li
		e1lo
		e1lu
		e1lja
		e1lje
		e1lji
		e1ljo
		e1lju
		e1ma
		e1me
		e1mi
		e1mo
		e1mu
		e1na
		e1ne
		e1ni
		e1no
		e1nu
		e1nja
		e1nje
		e1nji
		e1njo
		e1nju
		e1pa
		e1pe
		e1pi
		e1po
		e1pu
		e1ra
		e1re
		e1ri
		e1ro
		e1ru
		e1sa
		e1se
		e1si
		e1so
		e1su
		e1ša
		e1še
		e1ši
		e1šo
		e1šu
		e1ta
		e1te
		e1ti
		e1to
		e1tu
		e1va
		e1ve
		e1vi
		e1vo
		e1vu
		e1za
		e1ze
		e1zi
		e1zo
		e1zu
		e1ža
		e1že
		e1ži
		e1žo
		e1žu
		i1ba
		i1be
		i1bi
		i1bo
		i1bu
		i1ca
		i1ce
		i1ci
		i1co
		i1cu
		i1ča
		i1če
		i1či
		i1čo
		i1ču
		i1ća
		i1će
		i1ći
		i1ćo
		i1ću
		i1da
		i1de
		i1di
		i1do
		i1du
		i1dža
		i1dže
		i1dži
		i1džo
		i1džu
		i1đa
		i1đe
		i1đi
		i1đo
		i1đu
		i1fa
		i1fe
		i1fi
		i1fo
		i1fu
		i1ga
		i1ge
		i1gi
		i1go
		i1gu
		i1ha
		i1he
		i1hi
		i1ho
		i1hu
		i1ja
		i1je
		i1ji
		i1jo
		i1ju
		i1ka
		i1ke
		i1ki
		i1ko
		i1ku
		i1la
		i1le
		i1li
		i1lo
		i1lu
		i1lja
		i1lje
		i1lji
		i1ljo
		i1lju
		i1ma
		i1me
		i1mi
		i1mo
		i1mu
		i1na
		i1ne
		i1ni
		i1no
		i1nu
		i1nja
		i1nje
		i1nji
		i1njo
		i1nju
		i1pa
		i1pe
		i1pi
		i1po
		i1pu
		i1ra
		i1re
		i1ri
		i1ro
		i1ru
		i1sa
		i1se
		i1si
		i1so
		i1su
		i1ša
		i1še
		i1ši
		i1šo
		i1šu
		i1ta
		i1te
		i1ti
		i1to
		i1tu
		i1va
		i1ve
		i1vi
		i1vo
		i1vu
		i1za
		i1ze
		i1zi
		i1zo
		i1zu
		i1ža
		i1že
		i1ži
		i1žo
		i1žu
		o1ba
		o1be
		o1bi
		o1bo
		o1bu
		o1ca
		o1ce
		o1ci
		o1co
		o1cu
		o1ča
		o1če
		o1či
		o1čo
		o1ču
		o1ća
		o1će
		o1ći
		o1ćo
		o1ću
		o1da
		o1de
		o1di
		o1do
		o1du
		o1dža
		o1dže
		o1dži
		o1džo
		o1džu
		o1đa
		o1đe
		o1đi
		o1đo
		o1đu
		o1fa
		o1fe
		o1fi
		o1fo
		o1fu
		o1ga
		o1ge
		o1gi
		o1go
		o1gu
		o1ha
		o1he
		o1hi
		o1ho
		o1hu
		o1ja
		o1je
		o1ji
		o1jo
		o1ju
		o1ka
		o1ke
		o1ki
		o1ko
		o1ku
		o1la
		o1le
		o1li
		o1lo
		o1lu
		o1lja
		o1lje
		o1lji
		o1ljo
		o1lju
		o1ma
		o1me
		o1mi
		o1mo
		o1mu
		o1na
		o1ne
		o1ni
		o1no
		o1nu
		o1nja
		o1nje
		o1nji
		o1njo
		o1nju
		o1pa
		o1pe
		o1pi
		o1po
		o1pu
		o1ra
		o1re
		o1ri
		o1ro
		o1ru
		o1sa
		o1se
		o1si
		o1so
		o1su
		o1ša
		o1še
		o1ši
		o1šo
		o1šu
		o1ta
		o1te
		o1ti
		o1to
		o1tu
		o1va
		o1ve
		o1vi
		o1vo
		o1vu
		o1za
		o1ze
		o1zi
		o1zo
		o1zu
		o1ža
		o1že
		o1ži
		o1žo
		o1žu
		u1ba
		u1be
		u1bi
		u1bo
		u1bu
		u1ca
		u1ce
		u1ci
		u1co
		u1cu
		u1ča
		u1če
		u1či
		u1čo
		u1ču
		u1ća
		u1će
		u1ći
		u1ćo
		u1ću
		u1da
		u1de
		u1di
		u1do
		u1du
		u1dža
		u1dže
		u1dži
		u1džo
		u1džu
		u1đa
		u1đe
		u1đi
		u1đo
		u1đu
		u1fa
		u1fe
		u1fi
		u1fo
		u1fu
		u1ga
		u1ge
		u1gi
		u1go
		u1gu
		u1ha
		u1he
		u1hi
		u1ho
		u1hu
		u1ja
		u1je
		u1ji
		u1jo
		u1ju
		u1ka
		u1ke
		u1ki
		u1ko
		u1ku
		u1la
		u1le
		u1li
		u1lo
		u1lu
		u1lja
		u1lje
		u1lji
		u1ljo
		u1lju
		u1ma
		u1me
		u1mi
		u1mo
		u1mu
		u1na
		u1ne
		u1ni
		u1no
		u1nu
		u1nja
		u1nje
		u1nji
		u1njo
		u1nju
		u1pa
		u1pe
		u1pi
		u1po
		u1pu
		u1ra
		u1re
		u1ri
		u1ro
		u1ru
		u1sa
		u1se
		u1si
		u1so
		u1su
		u1ša
		u1še
		u1ši
		u1šo
		u1šu
		u1ta
		u1te
		u1ti
		u1to
		u1tu
		u1va
		u1ve
		u1vi
		u1vo
		u1vu
		u1za
		u1ze
		u1zi
		u1zo
		u1zu
		u1ža
		u1že
		u1ži
		u1žo
		u1žu
		b1b
		b1c
		b1č
		b1ć
		b1d
		b1dž
		b1đ
		b1f
		b1g
		b1h
		1bj
		2bj.
		b1k
		1bl
		2bl.
		2b1lj
		b1m
		b1n
		b1nj
		b1p
		1br
		2br.
		b1s
		b1š
		b1t
		1bv
		2bv.
		b1z
		b1ž
		c1b
		c1c
		c1č
		c1ć
		c1d
		c1dž
		c1đ
		c1f
		c1g
		c1h
		1cj
		2cj.
		c1k
		1cl
		2cl.
		2c1lj
		c1m
		c1n
		c1nj
		c1p
		1cr
		2cr.
		c1s
		c1š
		c1t
		1cv
		2cv.
		c1z
		c1ž
		č1b
		č1c
		č1č
		č1ć
		č1d
		č1dž
		č1đ
		č1f
		č1g
		č1h
		1čj
		2čj.
		č1k
		1čl
		2čl.
		2č1lj
		č1m
		č1n
		č1nj
		č1p
		1čr
		2čr.
		č1s
		č1š
		č1t
		1čv
		2čv.
		č1z
		č1ž
		ć1b
		ć1c
		ć1č
		ć1ć
		ć1d
		ć1dž
		ć1đ
		ć1f
		ć1g
		ć1h
		ć1j
		ć1k
		1ćl
		2ćl.
		2ć1lj
		ć1m
		ć1n
		ć1nj
		ć1p
		1ćr
		2ćr.
		ć1s
		ć1š
		ć1t
		1ćv
		2ćv.
		ć1z
		ć1ž
		d1b
		d1c
		d1č
		d1ć
		d1d
		d2ž
		d1đ
		d1f
		2d1g
		d1h
		1dj
		2dj.
		d1k
		2d1l
		2d1lj
		d1m
		d1n
		d1nj
		d1p
		1dr
		2dr.
		d1s
		d1š
		d1t
		1dv
		2dv.
		d1z
		dž1b
		dž1c
		dž1č
		dž1ć
		dž1d
		dž1dž
		dž1đ
		dž1f
		dž1g
		dž1h
		1džj
		2džj.
		dž1k
		1džl
		2džl.
		2dž1lj
		dž1m
		dž1n
		dž1nj
		dž1p
		1džr
		2džr.
		dž1s
		dž1š
		dž1t
		1džv
		2džv.
		dž1z
		dž1ž
		đ1b
		đ1c
		đ1č
		đ1ć
		đ1d
		đ1dž
		đ1đ
		đ1f
		đ1g
		đ1h
		1đj
		2đj.
		đ1k
		1đl
		2đl.
		2đ1lj
		đ1m
		đ1n
		đ1nj
		đ1p
		1đr
		2đr.
		đ1s
		đ1š
		đ1t
		1đv
		2đv.
		đ1z
		đ1ž
		f1b
		f1c
		f1č
		f1ć
		f1d
		f1dž
		f1đ
		f1f
		f1g
		f1h
		1fj
		2fj.
		f1k
		1fl
		2fl.
		2f1lj
		f1m
		f1n
		f1nj
		f1p
		1fr
		2fr.
		f1s
		f1š
		f1t
		1fv
		2fv.
		f1z
		f1ž
		g1b
		g1c
		g1č
		g1ć
		g1d
		g1dž
		g1đ
		g1f
		g1g
		g1h
		1gj
		2gj.
		g1k
		1gl
		2gl.
		2g1lj
		g1m
		g1n
		g1nj
		g1p
		1gr
		2gr.
		g1s
		g1š
		g1t
		1gv
		2gv.
		g1z
		g1ž
		h1b
		h1c
		h1č
		h1ć
		h1d
		h1dž
		h1đ
		h1f
		h1g
		h1h
		1hj
		2hj.
		h1k
		1hl
		2hl.
		2h1lj
		h1m
		h1n
		h1nj
		h1p
		1hr
		2hr.
		h1s
		h1š
		h1t
		1hv
		2hv.
		h1z
		h1ž
		j1b
		j1c
		j1č
		j1ć
		j1d
		j1dž
		j1đ
		j1f
		j1g
		j1h
		j1j
		j1k
		j1l
		2j1lj
		j1m
		j1n
		j1nj
		j1p
		j1r
		j1s
		j1š
		j1t
		j1v
		j1z
		j1ž
		k1b
		k1c
		k1č
		k1ć
		k1d
		k1dž
		k1đ
		k1f
		k1g
		k1h
		1kj
		2kj.
		k1k
		k1l
		1k2lj
		2klj.
		k1m
		k1n
		k1nj
		k1p
		1kr
		2kr.
		k1s
		k1š
		k1t
		k1v
		k1z
		k1ž
		l1b
		l1c
		l1č
		l1ć
		l1d
		l1dž
		l1đ
		l1f
		l1g
		l1h
		l1k
		l1l
		2l1lj
		l1m
		l1n
		l1nj
		l1p
		l1r
		l1s
		l1š
		l1t
		l1v
		l1z
		l1ž
		lj1b
		lj1c
		lj1č
		lj1ć
		lj1d
		lj1dž
		lj1đ
		lj1f
		lj1g
		lj1h
		lj1k
		1ljl
		2ljl.
		lj1lj
		lj1m
		lj1n
		lj1nj
		lj1p
		1ljr
		2ljr.
		lj1s
		lj1š
		lj1t
		1ljv
		2ljv.
		lj1z
		lj1ž
		m1b
		m1c
		m1č
		m1ć
		m1d
		m1dž
		m1đ
		m1f
		m1g
		m1h
		1mj
		2mj.
		m1k
		1ml
		2ml.
		2m1lj
		m1m
		m1n
		m1nj
		m1p
		1mr
		2mr.
		m1s
		m1š
		m1t
		1mv
		2mv.
		m1z
		m1ž
		n1b
		n1c
		n1č
		n1ć
		n1d
		n1dž
		n1đ
		n1f
		n1g
		n1h
		2nj.
		n1k
		1nl
		2nl.
		2n1lj
		n1m
		n1n
		n1nj
		n1p
		n1r
		n1s
		n1š
		n1t
		1nv
		2nv.
		n1z
		n1ž
		nj1b
		nj1c
		nj1č
		nj1ć
		nj1d
		nj1dž
		nj1đ
		nj1f
		nj1g
		nj1h
		1njj
		2njj.
		nj1k
		1njl
		2njl.
		2nj1lj
		nj1m
		nj1n
		nj1nj
		nj1p
		1njr
		2njr.
		nj1s
		nj1š
		nj1t
		1njv
		2njv.
		nj1z
		nj1ž
		p1b
		p1c
		p1č
		p1ć
		p1d
		p1dž
		p1đ
		p1f
		p1g
		2p1h
		1pj
		2pj.
		p1k
		1pl
		2pl.
		2p1lj
		p1m
		p1n
		p1nj
		p1p
		1pr
		2pr.
		p1s
		p1š
		p1t
		1pv
		2pv.
		p1z
		p1ž
		r1b
		r1c
		r1č
		r1ć
		r1d
		r1dž
		r1đ
		r1f
		r1g
		r1h
		r1j
		r1k
		r1l
		2r1lj
		r1m
		r1n
		r1nj
		r1p
		r1r
		r1s
		r1š
		r1t
		r1v
		r1z
		r1ž
		1sb
		2sb.
		s1c
		1sč
		2sč.
		1sć
		2sć.
		1sd
		2sd.
		1sdž
		2sdž.
		1sđ
		2sđ.
		1sf
		2sf.
		1sg
		2sg.
		1sh
		2sh.
		1sj
		2sj.
		1sk
		2sk.
		s1l
		1slj
		2slj.
		1sm
		2sm.
		s1n
		2sn.
		1snj
		2snj.
		s1p
		1sr
		2sr.
		1ss
		2ss.
		1sš
		2sš.
		s1t
		2st.
		1sv
		2sv.
		1sz
		2sz.
		1sž
		2sž.
		1šb
		2šb.
		š1c
		š1č
		š1ć
		1šd
		2šd.
		1šdž
		2šdž.
		1šđ
		2šđ.
		1šf
		2šf.
		1šg
		2šg.
		1šh
		2šh.
		1šj
		2šj.
		1šk
		2šk.
		š1l
		2š1lj
		1šm
		2šm.
		š1n
		2š1nj
		1šp
		2šp.
		1šr
		2šr.
		1šs
		2šs.
		1šš
		2šš.
		1št
		2št.
		1šv
		2šv.
		1šz
		2šz.
		1šž
		2šž.
		t1b
		t1c
		t1č
		t1ć
		t1d
		t1dž
		t1đ
		t1f
		t1g
		t1h
		1tj
		2tj.
		t1k
		1tl
		2tl.
		2t1lj
		t1m
		t1n
		t1nj
		t1p
		1tr
		2tr.
		t1s
		t1š
		t1t
		1tv
		2tv.
		t1z
		t1ž
		v1b
		v1c
		v1č
		v1ć
		v1d
		v1dž
		v1đ
		v1f
		v1g
		v1h
		v1j
		1v2je
		vj.
		v1k
		v1l
		2v1lj
		v1m
		v1n
		v1nj
		v1p
		1vr
		v1s
		v1š
		v1t
		v1v
		v1z
		v1ž
		z1b
		1zc
		2zc.
		1zč
		2zč.
		1zć
		2zć.
		z1d
		1zdž
		2zdž.
		1zđ
		2zđ.
		1zf
		2zf.
		z1g
		1zh
		2zh.
		1zj
		2zj.
		1zk
		2zk.
		z1l
		2z1lj
		z1m
		z1n
		1znj
		2znj.
		1zp
		2zp.
		z1r
		z1s
		1zš
		2zš.
		1zt
		2zt.
		1zv
		2zv.
		1zz
		2zz.
		1zž
		2zž.
		ž1b
		2žb.
		1žc
		2žc.
		1žč
		2žč.
		1žć
		2žć.
		1žd
		2žd.
		1ždž
		2ždž.
		1žđ
		2žđ.
		1žf
		2žf.
		1žg
		2žg.
		1žh
		2žh.
		ž1j
		1žk
		2žk.
		1žl
		2žl.
		ž1lj
		1žm
		2žm.
		ž1n
		2žn.
		2ž1nj
		1žp
		2žp.
		1žr
		2žr.
		1žs
		2žs.
		1žš
		2žš.
		1žt
		2žt.
		1žv
		2žv.
		1žz
		2žz.
		1žž
		2žž.
		2d1vj
		2d1vr
		z1g2nj
		ć1s2t
		d1s2m
		j1z2g
		r2n1t
		r2z1n
		m2p1t
		2d1vl
		r2t1c
		r2n1c
		r2č1k
		2s1hr
		z1v2l
		2z1vr
		r2k1n
		r2c1n
		r2h1nj
		s2p1n
		j1s2l
		r2d1n
		.zg2
		r2dž1b
		2š1tv
		r2t1s
		n2t1s
		2s1kr
		r2n1k
		d1š2k
		d1s2p
		r2t1m
		1r2je
		k2s1p
		t1s2t
		l2m1s
		r2h1k
		j1s2t
		s1v2l
		r2p1c
		t1k2l
		s1k2l
		n2t1n
		2d1ja
		2rt.
		z1r2j
		d1s2t
		n2k1c
		r2t1k
		r2g1n
		r2h1t
		.na2j1
		.be2z1
		.iz1
		.is1
		.ne2o3
		r2t1n
		r2v1n
		r1s2t
		n2s1t
		l2f1t
	</patterns>

</hyphenation-info>
